Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1178.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 93 of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FRURAL LIBRARY GRANT PROGRAMSec.9391. Definitions.9392. Rural Library Grant Program.9393. Application and approval.9394. Funding.9395. Reporting.§ 9391. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." As defined in section 102 (relating to definitions)."Eligible applicant." A local library with a population service area of less than 10,000 inhabitants."Grant program." The Rural Library Grant Program established under section 9392 (relating to Rural Library Grant Program).§ 9392. Rural Library Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Rural Library Grant Program is established as a competitive grant program in the department.(b) Use of grants.--Money awarded under the grant program shall be used for the following:(1) Maintenance projects.(2) Roof repairs and roof replacement.(3) Boilers and controls.(4) Plumbing systems.(5) Energy savings projects.(6) Heating, ventilation and air conditioning equipment.(7) Health and safety upgrades.(8) Emergencies.(9) Internet connectivity, but not including purchasing educational technology hardware or software.(10) Accessibility projects, in accordance with standards under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126 (relating to equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities).(c) Department powers and duties.--The department shall:(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph, establish guidelines necessary to award grants under this subchapter.(2) Award annual grants under the grant program in 20250HB1178PN1315 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with this subchapter to eligible applicants for uses provided under subsection (b).(3) Determine the form and manner by which applicants may apply for a grant under section 9393 (relating to application and approval) and post the information on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 9393. Application and approval.(a) Applications.--An application for a grant under this subchapter shall be submitted by an eligible applicant in the form and manner prescribed by the department.(b) Review process.--(1) The department shall review applications and make awards subject to subsection (c).(2) The department shall consider the geographical distribution of money to ensure that all areas of this Commonwealth participate to the greatest extent possible.(3) An eligible applicant may revise and resubmit a denied application to the department.(c) Allocation.--Each grant awarded under this section shall be for a minimum of $20,000, but no more than $100,000 in a fiscal year.§ 9394. Funding.The General Assembly shall appropriate money to the department from the General Fund for the purpose of awarding grants under this subchapter.§ 9395. Reporting.The department shall publish a list of the projects funded, including the name of the awardee and amount awarded, on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1178PN1315 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930